Tennessee, session 114, HB2297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-304(c), is amended by deleting
the language "one (1) high-traffic, highly and clearly visible public area that is" and substituting
"two (2) high-traffic, highly and clearly visible public areas that are".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2297
012581
- 1 -